Massachusetts, session 194th, S2410.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 76. (a) The department and any city, town, district or other political subdivision
of the commonwealth shall allocate reasonable space and accommodations for motorcycle
parking in all transportation facilities, parking facilities and related projects undertaken or
operated by them, where any federal, state or local public funds have been used to plan, design,
construct, equip, operate or maintain such facility or project. The department and any city, town,
district or other political subdivision may satisfy the requirement of this subsection by sectioning
off portions of an area that do not meet spacing requirements for the parking of full-size motor
vehicles to be used for motorcycle parking.
of 2

(b) The department and any city, town, district or other political subdivision of the
commonwealth shall not impose a prohibition or a requirement that applies only to a motorcycle,
motorcycle operator or motorcycle passenger, the primary purpose of which is to restrict or
inhibit access of a motorcycle, motorcycle operator or motorcycle passenger to any highway,
bridge, tunnel, public way or transportation facility.
(c) The department and any city, town, district or other political subdivision of the
commonwealth shall not develop any general or fiscal policy, promulgate any regulations,
allocate any funds, or plan, design, construct, equip, operate or maintain any transportation
facility, parking facility or related structure throughout the commonwealth in a manner that
discriminates against motorcycles, motorcycle operators or motorcycle passengers.
of 2